Illinois, session 104th, HB5138.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5adding Sections 132.3a and 1204.5 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/132.3a new)7    Sec. 132.3a. Power of the Director; affordable housing 8coverage. The Director shall examine and investigate the 9affairs of any company to determine whether the company has 10been or is engaged in any rate setting that is excessive, 11inadequate, or unfairly discriminatory regarding affordable 12housing developments as defined in Section 15 of the 13Affordable Housing Planning and Appeal Act. The examination 14and investigatory powers of the Director include any data 15calls and desk examinations to determine if different rates 16result for policyholders after any price differentials fail to 17reflect the difference in expected losses and expenses. The 18Director shall investigate whether policyholders who are 19owners of affordable housing developments as defined in 20Section 15 of the Affordable Housing Planning and Appeal Act 21are being subject to unfairly discriminatory rates as compared 22with similar types of market rate housing in Illinois.   HB5138- 2 -LRB104 18175 BAB 31614 b1    (215 ILCS 5/1204.5 new)2    Sec. 1204.5. Report on the housing insurance market for 3affordable rental housing.4    (a) Definitions. In this Section:5    "Affordable housing development" means a residential 6building with leased units required to be affordable by 7statute, regulation, regulatory agreement, or recorded 8covenant.9    "Excess line insurance" has the meaning given to "surplus 10line insurance" in Sections 445, 445a, and 445.1 of this Code.11    "Insurer" means an authorized insurer writing property or 12liability coverage on residential buildings and includes 13reporting by excess line placements through the Surplus Line 14Association of Illinois as provided by rule.15    "Multifamily residential building" means a property 16containing 5 or more dwelling units.17    "Nonprofit housing provider" means an organization 18described by Section 501(c)(3) of the United States Internal 19Revenue Code or an entity formed under the General Not For 20Profit Corporation Act of 1986 that constructs, owns, or 21operates residential housing in Illinois.22    (b) Annual report.23        (1) The Director shall submit a report detailed in 24    subsection (c) on or before October 1 of each year to the 25    Governor and the General Assembly that shall be posted on 26    the publicly accessible websites of both the Governor and   HB5138- 3 -LRB104 18175 BAB 31614 b1    the General Assembly.2        (2) The report shall analyze the availability, 3    pricing, terms, and affordability of property and 4    liability insurance for multifamily residential buildings 5    owned or operated by nonprofit and mission-driven 6    entities, including affordable housing developments.7        (3) The report shall include statewide and regional 8    results, with the City of Chicago reported separately from 9    the rest of the State.10    (c) Required contents. The report shall present, at a 11minimum, aggregated statistics for the prior calendar year on:12        (1) Premium levels and changes, including the average 13    and median premium per unit and square foot and premium as 14    a share of operating expenses.15        (2) Coverage availability and market channel, 16    including nonrenewal and declination counts, the share 17    placed in the excess line market, and use of the Illinois 18    property insurance underwriting association.19        (3) Deductibles by peril and trend.20        (4) Common exclusions and limitations, including new 21    or expanded exclusions introduced in the reporting year.22        (5) Coverage limits relative to reported replacement 23    cost.24        (6) Claims frequency and severity for fire, water, 25    wind, and liability, to the extent available.26        (7) Risk-mitigation credits and building resiliency   HB5138- 4 -LRB104 18175 BAB 31614 b1    investments reported by owners and recognized by insurers.2        (8) Regional heat-map summaries of market stress using 3    the methodology set by the Department by bulletin or 4    circular letter. The Department may align with the 5    National Association of Insurance Commissioners' market 6    intelligence data elements.7    (d) Data collection and confidentiality.8        (1) Submissions that constitute trade secrets or 9    sensitive commercial information are confidential under 10    the Freedom of Information Act. The published report shall 11    contain only aggregated, de-identified statistics and 12    analyses.13        (2) The Department shall consult with excess line and 14    Illinois property insurance underwriting associations 15    regarding reporting formats that capture excess-line 16    placements and assigned-risk activity without identifying 17    individual insureds.18    (e) Rulemaking. The Department may adopt rules or circular 19letters to implement this Section, harmonize data standards 20with the National Association of Insurance Commissioners and 21other states, limit the burden on small insurers, and ensure 22data quality. 23    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 24becoming law.